Washington statutes.
RCW 10.91.050

Costs.

The costs of the procedures required by this chapter shall be borne by the demanding state, except when the designated agent is not a public official. In any case when the designated agent is not a public official, he or she shall bear the cost of such procedures.

[ 2010 c 8 s 1092; 1971 ex.s. c 17 s 9.]